Utah statutes.
19-7-103.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Administrative proceeding" means an adjudicatory proceeding conducted by the  department or other government entity with authority to enforce any environmental law, including any notice of violation proceeding, any department proceeding listed in Section 19-1-305, or any proceeding conducted pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(2)  "Environmental audit report" means any document, information, report, finding, communication, note, drawing, graph, chart, photograph, survey, suggestion, or opinion, whether in preliminary, draft, or final form, prepared as the result of or in response to an environmental self-evaluation.

(3)  "Environmental law" means any requirement contained in this title, or in rules made under this title, or in any rules, orders, permits, licenses, or closure plans issued or approved by the department, or in any other provision or ordinance addressing protection of the environment.

(4)  "Environmental self-evaluation" means a self-initiated assessment, audit, or review, not otherwise expressly required by an environmental law, that is performed to determine whether a person is in compliance with environmental laws.  A person may perform an environmental self-evaluation through the use of employees or the use of outside consultants.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

